District of Columbia statutes.
16-1302

Assignment of judge for condemnation cases.

The chief judge of the United States District Court for the District of Columbia shall assign from time to time, and for such periods as he determines, one of the judges of the court to hear cases involving the condemnation of real property in the District of Columbia. In case of the disability of the judge so assigned, or for any other reason, the chief judge may assign any judge of the Court for service in condemnation cases.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1973 Ed., § 16-1302.
1981 Ed., § 16-1302.